District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0287.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Housing with Integrity Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-2851.11 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended by
adding new subsections (a-1) and (a-2) to read as follows:
“(a-1) The Center shall not issue a basic business license to a person or business entity, if
the person, business entity, or a member of that business entity has an ownership or member
interest in a rental property with 10 or more rental housing units and the total number of uncured
Class 1 and Class 2 infractions, as defined in 16 DCMR § 3305.1 and 16 DCMR § 3305.2,
equals or exceeds 30% of the unit count, with each infraction uncured for 90 days or more
following issuance of a notice of infraction.


“(a-2) The Department shall work with the Department of Buildings to verify that a
person or business entity is not disqualified under subsection (a-1) of this section from being
issued a basic business license.”.
Sec. 3. Section 3 of the Proactive Inspection Program Act of 2024, effective March 23,
2024 (D.C. Law 25-141; D.C. Official Code § 10-571.02), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “2 tiers: Tier 1 and Tier 2.”
and inserting the phrase “3 tiers: Tier 1, Tier 2, and Tier 3.” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Properties classified into the tiers shall be proactively inspected as follows:
“(A) Properties in Tier 1 shall be proactively inspected at least twice every
year;
“(B) Properties in Tier 2 shall be proactively inspected at least once every
2 years; and
“(C) Properties in Tier 3 shall be proactively inspected at least once every
6 years.”.
(c) Subsection (c) is amended by adding a new paragraph (3) to read as follows:
“(3) The Director shall assign a rental housing property to Tier 1 if the property
meets the criteria established in D.C. Official Code § 47-2851.11(a-1).”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).


Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or, in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).